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DTC P0 110/24 IntakeAirTemperatureCircuit

DTC P0 112/24 IntakeAirTemperatureCircuitLowInput

DTC P0 113/24 IntakeAirTemperatureCircuitHigh Input

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The intake air temperature (IAT) sensor, mounted on the mass
air flow (MAF) meter, monitors the intake air temperature. The
IAT sensor has a thermistor that varies its resistance depending
on the temperature of the intake air. When the air temperature
is low, the resistance in the thermistor increases. When the tem-
perature is high, the resistance drops. The variations in resis-
tance are reflected as voltage changes to the engine control
ECU terminal.
(SeeFig. 1).

The intake air temperature sensor is connected to the engine
control ECU (See below ). The 5 V power source voltage in the
engine control ECU is applied to the intake air temperature sen-
sor from terminal THA (THAR) via resistor R.
That is, the resistor R and the intake air temperature sensor are
connected in series. When the resistance value of the intake air
temperature sensor changes in accordance with changes in the
intake air temperature, the voltage at terminal THA (THAR) also
changes. Based on this signal, the engine control ECU in-
creases the fuel injectionvolumeto improve thedriveabilitydur-
ing cold engine operation.

DTCNo. Proceed to DTCDetectionCondition Trouble Area

P0110/24 Step 1

Open or short in intake air
temperature sensor circuit for
0.5sec. (IATequal to −40˚ C
(−40˚ F)ormore than 140˚ C
(284˚ F))
(1 tripdetection logic)

P0112/24 Step4

Short in intakeair tempera-
turesensorcircuit for0.5sec.
(IAT ismore than 140˚ C
(284˚ F))
(1 tripdetection logic)

SOpenorshort in intakeair temperaturesensorcircuit
S Intakeair temperaturesensor (built inmassair flowmeter)
SEnginecontrolECU

P0113/24 Step2

Open in intake air tempera-
ture sensor circuit for 0.5 sec.
(IAT is −40˚ C (−40˚ F))
(1 tripdetection logic)

DI1LE−15



A19962

8

1

A20
Air Flow Meter

Y−B

E7
28

E7
20

THA

E2
E1

R

5V

Engine Control ECU

3

10

7
BR−W

THA

E2

IN6

Ih1IN6

IR2

7

2

BR−WBR BR

Y−BY−B

IR2

−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINE
DI−51

2UZ−FEENGINESUP(RM 1113E)

HINT:
AfterconfirmingDTC”P0 110/24,P0 112/24orP0 113/24”,use thehand −held tester toconfirm the intakeair
temperature in the ”DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL”.

Temperature Displayed Malfunction

−40˚ C (−40˚F) Open circuit

140˚ C(284 ˚F)ormore Short circuit

MONITOR DESCRIPTION
The engine control ECU monitors the sensor voltage and uses this value to calculate the intake air tempera-
ture. When the sensor output voltage deviates from the normal operating range, the engine control ECU
interprets this as a fault in the IAT (Intake Air Temperature) sensor and sets a DTC.
Example:
When thesensorvoltageoutputequal to −40�C (−40�F),ormore than 140�C(284 �F).
This monitor runs 0.5 seconds after the ignition switch is turned ON.

WIRING DIAGRAM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
S Read freeze framedatausing thehand − held tester .Freeze framedata records theengineconditions

when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the
vehiclewas runningorstopped, if theenginewaswarmedupornot, if theair −fuel ratiowas leanor
rich, and other data from the time the malfunction occurred.
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1 Connect hand−held tester, and read value of intake air temperature.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand−held tester main switch ON.
(c) When using hand−held tester, enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST /

ALL / INTAKE AIR.
CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the hand−held tester.
OK:

Same as actual intake air temperature.
RESULT:

Temperature Displayed Proceed to

−40˚  C (−40˚  F) A

140˚  C (284˚  F) or more B

OK (Same as present temperature) C

HINT:
S If there is an open circuit, the hand−held tester indicates −40˚ C (−40˚ F).
S If there is a short circuit, the hand−held tester indicates 140˚ C (284˚ F) or more.

B Go to step 4.

C Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI−3) .

A



A19549

THA

E2

EngineControlECU

2

1

Air
FlowMeter

Air
FlowMeter

1 2

A20

THAE2

A20

−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINE
DI−53

2UZ−FEENGINESUP(RM 1113E)

2 Check for open in harness or engine control ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a)Disconnect theA20air flowmeterconnector.
(b)Connect terminals 1 and2of theair flowmeterwirehar-

ness side connector.
(c)Turn the ignitionswitchON.
(d)Whenusinghand −held tester,enter the followingmenus:

DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / INTAKE
AIR.

CHECK:
Read the temperaturevalueon thehand −held tester.
OK:

Temperaturevalue: 140�C(284 �F)ormore

OKConfirmgoodconnectionatsensor. IfOK, re-
place mass air flow meter.

NG
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3 Check for open in harness or engine control ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect terminals THA and E2 of the E7 engine control

ECU connector.
HINT:
Before checking, do a visual and contact pressure checks for
the engine control ECU connector.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(c) When using hand−held tester, enter the following menus:

DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / INTAKE
AIR.

CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the hand−held tester.
OK:

Temperature value: 140�C (284�F) or more

OK Repair or replace harness or connector.

NG

Confirm good connection at engine control
ECU. If OK, check and replace engine control
ECU (See page IN−20).

4 Check for short in harness and engine control ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the A20 air flow meter connector.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(c) When using hand−held tester, enter the following menus:

DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / INTAKE
AIR.

CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the hand−held tester.
OK:

Temperature value: −40�C (−40�F)

OK Replace mass air flow meter.

NG
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5 Check for short in harness or engine control ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the E7 engine control ECU connector.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(c) When using hand−held tester, enter the following menus:

DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / INTAKE
AIR.

CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the hand−held tester.
OK:

Temperature value: −40�C (−40�F)

OK Repair or replace harness or connector.

NG

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI−74).


